Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.230

Washington professional educator standards board—Review of proposed assessments before implementation.

The Washington professional educator standards board shall report the proposed assessments to the legislative education committees for review and comment prior to implementing the assessments by contractual agreement with the selected vendor or vendors.

[ 2000 c 39 s 202.]

NOTES:

Findings—Part headings and section captions not law—2000 c 39: See notes following RCW 28A.410.200.